Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 3. Examination

§ 1641.
Repealed.
1959, No. 261, § 68.

§ 1641a.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 1642.
Impeachment of own witness.

When, in the opinion of the court, a witness produced by a party is adverse, such party, by leave of court, may prove that such witness has made statements inconsistent with his or her testimony.
Before such proof is given, the attention of the witness shall be called to the occasion of such supposed statements and he or she be asked whether or not he or she has made the same.

§ 1643.
Expert witness.

An expert witness may be asked to state his or her opinion based on the witness’ personal observation, or on evidence introduced at the trial and seen or heard by the witness, or on his or her technical knowledge of the subject, without first specifying hypothetically in the question the data on which this opinion is based.
On direct or cross-examination, such expert witness may be required to specify the data on which his or her opinion is based.

§ 1644.
Witnesses may be examined separately.

On the trial of a civil cause, in its discretion, upon the application of either party, the Superior Court may order the witnesses of the adverse party examined separately and apart from each other.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10, eff. July 1, 1965, operative Feb. 1, 1967;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 70.

§ 1645.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 1646.
Evidence of sexual conduct.

In a civil action arising from alleged wrongful sexual activity and in professional licensing board administrative hearings where alleged wrongful sexual activity is an issue:

Neither opinion evidence of, nor evidence of the reputation of the complaining witness’ sexual conduct shall be admitted.

Evidence shall be required as it is for all other civil actions.

Evidence of prior sexual conduct of the complaining witness shall not be admitted; provided, however, where it bears on the credibility of the complaining witness or it is material to a fact at issue and its probative value outweighs its private character, the court may admit:

evidence of the complaining witness’ past sexual conduct with the defendant;

evidence of specific instances of the complaining witness’ sexual conduct showing the source of origin of semen, pregnancy, or disease;

evidence of specific instances of the complaining witness’ past false allegations of wrongful sexual activity.

In a civil action arising from alleged wrongful sexual activity, if a party proposes to offer evidence described in subdivision (a)(3) of this section, that party shall prior to the introduction of such evidence file written notice of intent to introduce that evidence, and the court shall order an in camera hearing to determine its admissibility. All objections to materiality, credibility, and probative value shall be stated on the record by the opposing party at the in camera hearing, and the court shall rule on the objections immediately, and prior to the taking of any other evidence.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1996.